West Virginia, session 2026, HB5330.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 4F. EXPEDITED PARTNER THERAPY. §16-4F-2. Expedited partner therapy. (a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, a health care professional who makes a clinical diagnosis of a sexually transmitted disease may provide expedited partner therapy for the treatment of the sexually transmitted disease if, in the judgment of the health care professional, the sexual partner is unlikely or unable to present for comprehensive health care, including evaluation, testing and treatment for sexually transmitted diseases. Expedited partner therapy is limited to a sexual partner who may have been exposed to a sexually transmitted disease within the previous sixty days and who is able to be contacted by the patient.(b) Any health care professional who provides expedited partner therapy shall comply with all necessary provisions of article four of this chapter.(c) A health care professional who provides expedited partner therapy shall provide counseling for the patient, including advice that all women and symptomatic persons, and in particular women with symptoms suggestive of pelvic inflammatory disease, are encouraged to seek medical attention. The health care professional shall also provide in written or electronic format materials provided by the department to be given by the patient to his or her sexual partner.(d) Expedited partner treatment may also be used for the treatment of bacterial vaginitis and trichomoniasis with flagyl and clindamycin cream.